Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3. Disease Control Measures.

§ 32.1-42.
Emergency rules and regulations.

The Board of Health may promulgate regulations and orders to meet any emergency or to prevent a potential emergency caused by a disease dangerous to public health, including, but not limited to, procedures specifically responding to any disease listed pursuant to §

32.1-35

that is determined to be caused by an agent or substance used as a weapon or any communicable disease of public health threat that is involved in an order of quarantine or an order of isolation pursuant to Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

1979, c. 711; 2002, c. 768; 2004, cc. 773, 1021.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 768 inserted “including procedures specifically responding to any disease listed pursuant to §

32.1-35

that is determined to be caused by an agent or substance used as a weapon.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by c. 773, effective April 12, 2004, and c. 1021, effective April 21, 2004, are identical, and inserted “of Health,” “but not limited to” and added the language beginning “or any communicable disease” at the end.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Executive order requiring face masks. —

Winery was not entitled to a temporary injunction from enforcement of an executive order requiring face coverings to be worn by individuals in certain settings, because the Governor of Virginia and the Virginia State Health Commissioner validly enacted the order to limit the spread of COVID-19 and expressly waived the application of the criminal prohibition on the wearing of a mask to conceal one’s identity. The winery could not demonstrate a likely success as to the merits, irreparable harm, the balance of equities, and the public interest. Strother v. Northam, 105 Va. Cir. 233, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 106 (Fauquier County June 29, 2020).

§ 32.1-42.1.
Administration and dispensing of necessary drugs, devices and vaccines during a declared disaster or emergency.

The Commissioner, pursuant to § 54.1-3408, may authorize persons who are not authorized by law to administer or dispense drugs or devices to administer or dispense all necessary drugs or devices in accordance with protocols established by the Commissioner when (i) the Governor has declared a disaster or a state of emergency, the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services has issued a declaration of an actual or potential bioterrorism incident or other actual or potential public health emergency, or the Board has made an emergency order pursuant to §

32.1-13

for the purpose of suppressing nuisances dangerous to the public health and communicable, contagious, and infectious diseases and other dangers to the public life and health and for the limited purpose of administering vaccines as an approved countermeasure for such communicable, contagious, and infectious diseases; (ii) it is necessary to permit the provision of needed drugs or devices; and (iii) such persons have received the training necessary to safely administer or dispense the needed drugs or devices. Such persons shall administer or dispense all drugs or devices under the direction, control, and supervision of the Commissioner. For purposes of this section, “administer,” “device,” “dispense,” and “drug” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 54.1-3401. The Commissioner shall develop protocols, in consultation with the Department of Health Professions, that address the required training of such persons and procedures for such persons to use in administering or dispensing drugs or devices.

Where the Commissioner, pursuant to subsection A, authorizes persons who are not otherwise authorized by law to administer vaccines, such persons shall include any of the following who, due to their education and training, are qualified to administer drugs: (i) any person licensed by a health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions whose license is in good standing, or was in good standing within the 20 years immediately prior to lapsing; (ii) any emergency medical services provider licensed or certified by the Department whose license or certification is in good standing, or was in good standing within the 20 years immediately prior to lapsing; and (iii) any health professions student enrolled in an accredited program in the Commonwealth who is in good academic standing with such student’s school and provided that the school certifies that the student has been properly trained in the administration of vaccines. A health professions student who administers vaccines pursuant to this section shall be supervised by any eligible health care provider who holds a license issued by a health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions, and the supervising health care provider shall not be required to be licensed in the same health profession for which the student is studying. A person who is licensed as a nurse practitioner by the Boards of Medicine and Nursing or licensed as a physician assistant by the Board of Medicine who administers vaccines pursuant to this section may administer such vaccine without a written or electronic practice agreement. In the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, any such person authorized by the Commissioner or entity overseeing any such person who administers the vaccine pursuant to this section shall not be liable for (a) any actual or alleged injury or wrongful death or (b) any civil cause of action arising from any act or omission arising out of, related to, or alleged to have resulted in the contraction of or exposure to the communicable, contagious, and infectious disease or to have resulted from the administration of the vaccine.

History.

2003, c. 794; 2007, cc. 699, 783; 2022, cc. 733, 774.

Effective date.

This section became effective March 20, 2003.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 699 and 783 are identical, and deleted “caused by an act of terrorism” following “state of emergency.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by cc. 733 and 774, effective April 27, 2022, are identical, and added the subsection A designation; in subsection A, substituted “state of emergency, the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services” for “state of emergency or the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services”, and added “or the Board has made an emergency order pursuant to §

32.1-13

for the purpose of suppressing nuisances dangerous to the public health and communicable, contagious, and infectious diseases and other dangers to the public life and health and for the limited purpose of administering vaccines as an approved countermeasure for such communicable, contagious, and infectious diseases” in clause (i); added subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Flu vaccinations. —

Emergency medical service providers may only administer vaccinations for the H1N1 flu or the seasonal flu when designated and authorized by the State Health Commissioner in accordance with §

32.1-42.1

and subsection P of § 54.1-3408. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Morgan Griffith, Member, House of Delegates, 09-076,
(10/23/09).

§ 32.1-42.2.
Declared emergency; priority for personal protective equipment and immunization; funeral service licensees and funeral service establishment employees.

In any case in which the Board or the Commissioner has made an emergency order or regulation to meet an emergency, not provided for by general regulations, for the purpose of suppressing nuisances dangerous to the public health or a communicable, contagious, or infectious disease or other danger to the public life and health, funeral service licensees and any person employed by a funeral service establishment shall be included in any group afforded priority with regard to (i) access to personal protective equipment and (ii) administration of any vaccination against such communicable disease of public health threat during such emergency.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 216.

Effective date.

This section is effective March 18, 2021, by emergency.

§ 32.1-43.
Authority of State Health Commissioner to require quarantine, etc.

The State Health Commissioner shall have the authority to require quarantine, isolation, immunization, decontamination, or treatment of any individual or group of individuals when he determines any such measure to be necessary to control the spread of any disease of public health importance and the authority to issue orders of isolation pursuant to Article 3.01 (§

32.1-48.01

et seq.) of this chapter and orders of quarantine and orders of isolation under exceptional circumstances involving any communicable disease of public health threat pursuant to Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-8; 1979, c. 711; 1990, c. 958; 2004, cc. 773, 1021.

Cross references.

As to quarantine of prisoners in state correctional institutions and jails, see §§ 53.1-34 and 53.1-133.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 773, effective April 12, 2004, and 1021, effective April 21, 2004, are identical, and inserted “State Health,” substituted “have the authority” for “have authority,” “isolation, immunization, decontamination” for “vaccination,” inserted “or group of individuals,” and added the language beginning “and the authority to issue orders” at the end.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Executive order requiring face masks. —

Winery was not entitled to a temporary injunction from enforcement of an executive order requiring face coverings to be worn by individuals in certain settings, because the Governor of Virginia and the Virginia State Health Commissioner validly enacted the order to limit the spread of COVID-19 and expressly waived the application of the criminal prohibition on the wearing of a mask to conceal one’s identity. The winery could not demonstrate a likely success as to the merits, irreparable harm, the balance of equities, and the public interest. Strother v. Northam, 105 Va. Cir. 233, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 106 (Fauquier County June 29, 2020).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Enforcement of quarantine in health emergency. —

The Governor, State Health Commissioner and Board of Health have the authority in a public health emergency to issue orders or regulations to enforce a quarantine. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John M. O’Bannon, III, Member, House of Delegates, 02-069,
(11/13/02).

§ 32.1-44.
Isolated or quarantined persons.

The provisions of this chapter shall be construed to allow any isolated or quarantined person to choose his own treatment, whenever practicable and in the best interest of the health and safety of the isolated or quarantined person and the public; however, the conditions of any order of isolation issued pursuant to Article 3.01 (§

32.1-48.01

et seq.) of this chapter involving a communicable disease of public health significance and any order of quarantine or order of isolation involving any communicable disease of public health threat pursuant to Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of this chapter shall remain in effect until the person or persons subject to such order of quarantine or order of isolation shall no longer constitute a threat to other persons.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-13; 1979, c. 711; 1990, c. 958; 2004, cc. 773, 1021.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 773, effective April 12, 2004, and 1021, effective April 21, 2004, are identical, and rewrote the section.

§ 32.1-45.
Expense of treatment.

Except as specifically provided by law, the provisions of this chapter shall not be construed as relieving any individual of the expense, if any, of any treatment, including any person who is subject to an order of isolation issued pursuant to Article 3.01 (§

32.1-48.01

et seq.) of this chapter or an order of quarantine or an order of isolation issued pursuant to Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-56; 1973, c. 401; 1979, c. 711; 1990, c. 958; 2004, cc. 773, 1021.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 773, effective April 12, 2004, and 1021, effective April 21, 2004, are identical, and added the language beginning “including any person who is subject” at the end.

§ 32.1-45.1.
Deemed consent to testing and release of test results related to infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses.

Whenever any health care provider, or any person employed by or under the direction and control of a health care provider, is directly exposed to body fluids of a patient in a manner that may, according to the then current guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, transmit human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses, the patient whose body fluids were involved in the exposure shall be deemed to have consented to testing for infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses. Such patient shall also be deemed to have consented to the release of such test results to the person who was exposed. In other than emergency situations, it shall be the responsibility of the health care provider to inform patients of this provision prior to providing them with health care services which create a risk of such exposure.

Whenever any patient is directly exposed to body fluids of a health care provider, or of any person employed by or under the direction and control of a health care provider, in a manner that may, according to the then current guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, transmit human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses, the person whose body fluids were involved in the exposure shall be deemed to have consented to testing for infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses. Such person shall also be deemed to have consented to the release of such test results to the patient who was exposed.

For the purposes of this section, “health care provider” means any person, facility or agency licensed or certified to provide care or treatment by the Department of Health, Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, Department of Rehabilitative Services, or the Department of Social Services, any person licensed or certified by a health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions except for the Boards of Funeral Directors and Embalmers and Veterinary Medicine or any personal care agency contracting with the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

“Health care provider,” as defined in subsection C, shall be deemed to include any person who renders emergency care or assistance, without compensation and in good faith, at the scene of an accident, fire, or any life-threatening emergency, or while en route therefrom to any hospital, medical clinic or doctor’s office during the period while rendering such emergency care or assistance. The Department of Health shall provide appropriate counseling and opportunity for face-to-face disclosure of any test results to any such person.

Whenever any law-enforcement officer, salaried or volunteer firefighter, or salaried or volunteer emergency medical services provider is directly exposed to body fluids of a person in a manner that may, according to the then current guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, transmit human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses, the person whose body fluids were involved in the exposure shall be deemed to have consented to testing for infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses. Such person shall also be deemed to have consented to the release of such test results to the person who was exposed. If the person whose body fluids were involved in the exposure is deceased, the decedent’s next of kin shall be deemed to have consented to testing of the decedent’s blood for infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses and release of such test results to the person who was exposed.

Whenever a person is directly exposed to the body fluids of a law-enforcement officer, salaried or volunteer firefighter, or salaried or volunteer emergency medical services provider in a manner that may, according to the then current guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, transmit human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses, the person whose body fluids were involved in the exposure shall be deemed to have consented to testing for infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses. The law-enforcement officer, salaried or volunteer firefighter, or salaried or volunteer emergency medical services provider shall also be deemed to have consented to the release of such test results to the person who was exposed.

For the purposes of this section, “law-enforcement officer” means a person who is both (i) engaged in his public duty at the time of such exposure and (ii) employed by any sheriff’s office, any adult or youth correctional facility, or any state or local law-enforcement agency, or any agency or department under the direction and control of the Commonwealth or any local governing body that employs persons who have law-enforcement authority.

Whenever any school board employee is directly exposed to body fluids of any person in a manner that may, according to the then current guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, transmit human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses, the person whose body fluids were involved in the exposure shall be deemed to have consented to testing for infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses. Such person shall also be deemed to have consented to the release of such test results to the school board employee who was exposed.

Whenever any person is directly exposed to the body fluids of a school board employee in a manner that may, according to the then current guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, transmit human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses, the school board employee whose body fluids were involved in the exposure shall be deemed to have consented to testing for infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses. The school board employee shall also be deemed to have consented to the release of such test results to the person.

For the purposes of this section, “school board employee” means a person who is both (i) acting in the course of employment at the time of such exposure and (ii) employed by any local school board in the Commonwealth.

For purposes of this section, if the person whose blood specimen is sought for testing is a minor, consent for obtaining such specimen shall be obtained from the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis of such minor prior to initiating such testing. If the parent or guardian or person standing in loco parentis withholds such consent, or is not reasonably available, the person potentially exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses, or the employer of such person, may petition the juvenile and domestic relations district court in the county or city where the minor resides or resided, or, in the case of a nonresident, the county or city where the health care provider, law-enforcement agency or school board has its principal office or, in the case of a health care provider rendering emergency care pursuant to subsection D, the county or city where the exposure occurred, for an order requiring the minor to provide a blood specimen or to submit to testing and to disclose the test results in accordance with this section.

Except as provided in subsection K, if the person whose blood specimen is sought for testing refuses to provide such specimen, any person identified by this section who was potentially exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus or the hepatitis B or C viruses in the manner described by this section, or the employer of such person, may petition, on a form to be provided by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the general district court of the county or city in which the person whose specimen is sought resides or resided, or, in the case of a nonresident, the county or city where the health care provider, law-enforcement agency or school board has its principal office or, in the case of a health care provider rendering emergency care pursuant to subsection D, the county or city where the exposure occurred, for an order requiring the person to provide a blood specimen or to submit to testing and to disclose the test results in accordance with this section. A hearing on such a petition shall be given precedence on the docket so as to be heard by the court within 48 hours of the filing of the petition, or, if the court is closed during such time period, such petition shall be heard on the next day that the court is in session. A copy of the petition, which shall specify the date and location of the hearing, shall be provided to the person whose specimen is sought. At any hearing before the court, the person whose specimen is sought or his counsel may appear. The court may be advised by the Commissioner or his designee prior to entering any testing order. If the general district court determines that there is probable cause to believe that a person identified by this section has been exposed in the manner prescribed by this section, the court shall issue an order requiring the person whose bodily fluids were involved in the exposure to provide a blood specimen or to submit to testing and to disclose the test results in accordance with this section. If a testing order is issued, both the petitioner and the person from whom the blood specimen is sought shall receive counseling and opportunity for face-to-face disclosure of any test results by a licensed practitioner or trained counselor.

Any person who is subject to a testing order may appeal the order of the general district court to the circuit court of the same jurisdiction within 10 days of receiving notice of the order. Any hearing conducted pursuant to this subsection shall be held in camera as soon as practicable. The record shall be sealed. The order of the circuit court shall be final and nonappealable.

No specimen obtained pursuant to this section shall be tested for any purpose other than for the purpose provided for in this section, nor shall the specimen or the results of any testing pursuant to this section be used for any purpose in any criminal matter or investigation. Any violation of this subsection shall constitute reversible error in any criminal case in which the specimen or results were used.

History.

1989, c. 613; 1993, c. 315; 1994, cc. 230, 236; 1997, c. 869; 2003, c. 1; 2008, cc. 191, 339; 2009, cc. 96, 478, 552, 813, 840; 2015, cc. 51, 502, 503; 2019, c. 27; 2020, c. 502.

Cross references.

As to guidelines for school attendance for children infected with human immunodeficiency virus and notification of school employees, see § 22.1-271.3.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1 redesignated former subsection H as present subsection L, and added present subsections H through K; and in the first sentence of present subsection L, added “Except as provided in subsection K” at the beginning, and substituted “provider, law-enforcement agency or school board” for “provider or law-enforcement agency.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 191 and 339 are identical, and rewrote subsection K and inserted “or, in the case of a health . . . where the exposure occurred” in the first sentence of subsection L.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 96, 478 and 552 are identical, and substituted “that” for “which” and inserted “and Prevention” following “Centers for Disease Control” throughout the section; in subsections E and in two places in F, inserted “salaried or volunteer firefighter, paramedic or emergency medical technician” following “law-enforcement officer” and substituted “person” for “law-enforcement officer”; deleted the former last sentence in subsection E, which read: In other than emergency situations, it shall be the responsibility of the law-enforcement officer to inform the person of this provision prior to the contact which creates a risk of such exposure”; and added “who was exposed” at the end of the last sentence in subsection F.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 51 added the third sentence in subsection H.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and throughout the section, substituted “salaried or volunteer emergency medical services provider” for “paramedic or emergency medical technician”; and deleted “of this section” following “subsection C” in subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 27, in subsection H, deleted the last two sentences, which read: “If the person whose blood specimen is sought for testing is a minor, the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis of such minor shall be notified prior to initiating such testing. In other than emergency situations, it shall be the responsibility of the school board employee to inform the person of this provision prior to the contact that creates a risk of such exposure”; in subsection K, deleted “and that minor refuses to provide such specimen” preceding “consent for obtaining”; in subsection L, substituted “identified by this section who was potentially exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus or the hepatitis B or C viruses in the manner described by this section, or the employer of such person, may petition, on a form to be provided by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia” for “potentially exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses, or the employer of such person may petition” in the first sentence and added the second, third and sixth sentences; and added subsections M and N.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 502 added the last sentence of subsection E.

Law Review.

For survey on evidence in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 647 (1989).

For annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2009).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-759 Petition to Require Blood Test. No. 9-4403 Petition to Require Blood Test.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 1.